California, session 20252026, SB134.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12838.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:12838.6. The following entities shall be continued in existence within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and shall retain existing functions, powers, responsibilities, and jurisdiction, except as expressly provided otherwise: Council on Criminal Justice and Behavioral Health, Prison Industry Authority, Prison Industry Authority Board, California Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision, and the Joint Venture Policy Advisory Board. For purposes of this article, these shall be known as “continuing entities.”SEC. 2. Section 830.83 is added to the Penal Code, immediately following Section 830.8, to read:830.83. (a) Commencing on July 1, 2026, until July 1, 2029, a chief of police appointed by a qualified entity enrolled in the pilot program established by Section 11073 and meeting the requirements of a qualified member, or a police officer, public safety officer, or investigator employed in that capacity by a qualified entity enrolled in the pilot program established by Section 11073 and meeting the requirements of a qualified member, is a peace officer. As used in this section, “qualified entity” and “qualified member” have the meanings set forth in Section 11073.(b) The authority of a peace officer designated pursuant to this section extends to any place within the territorial boundaries of the Indian country of the employing tribe, in accordance with and subject to any limitations of Public Law 280 (18 U.S.C. Sec. 1162). The authority of a peace officer designated pursuant to this section may also extend to any place in the state, under any of the following circumstances:(1) At the request of a state or local law enforcement agency.(2) Under exigent circumstances involving an immediate danger to persons or property, or the escape of a perpetrator.(3) For the purpose of making an arrest consistent with Section 836, when a public offense has occurred, or there is probable cause to believe a public offense has occurred, within the Indian country of the tribe that employs the peace officer, and with the prior consent of the chief of police or chief, director, or chief executive officer of a consolidated municipal public safety agency, or person authorized by that chief, director, or officer to give consent, if the place is within a city, or of the sheriff, or person authorized by the sheriff to give consent, if the place is within an unincorporated area of a county.(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), when the peace officer is in hot pursuit or close pursuit of an individual that the officer has reasonable suspicion has violated or attempted to violate state law and the violation occurred within the Indian country of the tribe that employs the peace officer.(5) When delivering an apprehended person to the custody of a law enforcement authority or magistrate in the city or county in which the offense occurred.(c) This section shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of this section.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 832.55 is added to the Penal Code, immediately following Section 832.5, to read:832.55. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 13510.1, peace officers described in Section 830.83 shall be subject to the applicable requirements of, the certification program for peace officers described in Section 13510.1.(b) (1) Every peace officer described in Section 830.83 shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training upon completion of a 12-month probationary period, but in no case later than 24 months after their employment, in order to continue to exercise the powers of a peace officer after the expiration of the 24-month period.(2) If the probationary period established by the employing agency is 24 months, a peace officer described in this subdivision may continue to exercise the powers of a peace officer for an additional 3-month period to allow for the processing of the certification application.(c) Each police chief, or any other person in charge of a qualified entity, as defined in Section 11073, as a condition of continued authority as a peace officer, shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training within two years of appointment.(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not apply to a police officer, public safety officer, or investigator described in Section 830.83 who currently possesses a valid and active basic certificate.(e) This section shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of this section.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 1233.9 of the Penal Code is repealed.1233.9.(a)There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Recidivism Reduction Fund for moneys to be available upon appropriation by the Legislature, for activities designed to reduce the state’s prison population, including, but not limited to, reducing recidivism. Funds available in the Recidivism Reduction Fund may be transferred to the State Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund.(b)Any funds in the Recidivism Reduction Fund not encumbered by June 30, 2016, shall revert to the General Fund upon order of the Department of Finance.(c)The Recidivism Reduction Fund shall be abolished once all funds encumbered in the Recidivism Reduction Fund are liquidated.SEC. 5. Section 1233.10 of the Penal Code is repealed.1233.10.(a)Upon agreement to accept funding from the Recidivism Reduction Fund, created in Section 1233.9, a county board of supervisors, in collaboration with the county’s Community Corrections Partnership, shall develop, administer, and collect and submit data to the Board of State and Community Corrections regarding a competitive grant program intended to fund community recidivism and crime reduction services, including, but not limited to, delinquency prevention, homelessness prevention, and reentry services.(1)Commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year, the funding shall be allocated to counties by the State Controller’s Office from Item 5227-101-3259 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2014 according to the following schedule:Alameda$250,000Alpine$10,000Amador$10,000Butte$50,000Calaveras$10,000Colusa$10,000Contra Costa$250,000Del Norte$10,000El Dorado$50,000Fresno$250,000Glenn$10,000Humboldt$50,000Imperial$50,000Inyo$10,000Kern$250,000Kings$50,000Lake$25,000Lassen$10,000Los Angeles$ 1,600,000Madera$50,000Marin$50,000Mariposa$10,000Mendocino$25,000Merced$50,000Modoc$10,000Mono$10,000Monterey$100,000Napa$50,000Nevada$25,000Orange$500,000Placer$50,000Plumas$10,000Riverside$500,000Sacramento$250,000San Benito$25,000San Bernardino$500,000San Diego$500,000San Francisco$250,000San Joaquin$250,000San Luis Obispo$50,000San Mateo$250,000Santa Barbara$100,000Santa Clara$500,000Santa Cruz$50,000Shasta$50,000Sierra$10,000Siskiyou$10,000Solano$100,000Sonoma$100,000Stanislaus$100,000Sutter$25,000Tehama$25,000Trinity$10,000Tulare$100,000Tuolumne$25,000Ventura$250,000Yolo$50,000Yuba$25,000(2)Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, the funding shall be allocated to counties by the State Controller’s Office from Item 5227-101-3259 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2015 according to the following schedule:Alameda$125,000Alpine$5,000Amador$5,000Butte$25,000Calaveras$5,000Colusa$5,000Contra Costa$125,000Del Norte$5,000El Dorado$25,000Fresno$125,000Glenn$5,000Humboldt$25,000Imperial$25,000Inyo$5,000Kern$125,000Kings$25,000Lake$12,500Lassen$5,000Los Angeles$800,000Madera$25,000Marin$25,000Mariposa$5,000Mendocino$12,500Merced$25,000Modoc$5,000Mono$5,000Monterey$50,000Napa$25,000Nevada$12,500Orange$250,000Placer$25,000Plumas$5,000Riverside$250,000Sacramento$125,000San Benito$12,500San Bernardino$250,000San Diego$250,000San Francisco$125,000San Joaquin$125,000San Luis Obispo$25,000San Mateo$125,000Santa Barbara$50,000Santa Clara$250,000Santa Cruz$25,000Shasta$25,000Sierra$5,000Siskiyou$5,000Solano$50,000Sonoma$50,000Stanislaus$50,000Sutter$12,500Tehama$12,500Trinity$5,000Tulare$50,000Tuolumne$12,500Ventura$125,000Yolo$25,000Yuba$12,500(b)For purposes of this section, “community recidivism and crime reduction service provider” means a nongovernmental entity or a consortium or coalition of nongovernmental entities, that provides community recidivism and crime reduction services, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), to persons who have been released from the state prison, a county jail, a juvenile detention facility, who are under the supervision of a parole or probation department, or any other person at risk of becoming involved in criminal activities.(c)(1)A community recidivism and crime reduction service provider shall have a demonstrated history of providing services, as described in paragraph (2), to the target population during the five years immediately prior to the application for a grant awarded pursuant to this section.(2)A community recidivism and crime reduction service provider shall provide services that are designed to enable persons to whom the services are provided to refrain from engaging in crime, reconnect with their family members, and contribute to their communities. Community recidivism and crime reduction services may include all of the following:(A)Self-help groups.(B)Individual or group assistance with basic life skills.(C)Mentoring programs.(D)Academic and educational services, including, but not limited to, services to enable the recipient to earn his or her high school diploma.(E)Job training skills and employment.(F)Truancy prevention programs.(G)Literacy programs.(H)Any other service that advances community recidivism and crime reduction efforts, as identified by the county board of supervisors and the Community Corrections Partnership.(I)Individual or group assistance with referrals for any of the following:(i)Mental and physical health assessments.(ii)Counseling services.(iii)Education and vocational programs.(iv)Employment opportunities.(v)Alcohol and drug treatment.(vi)Health, wellness, fitness, and nutrition programs and services.(vii)Personal finance and consumer skills programs and services.(viii)Other personal growth and development programs to reduce recidivism.(ix)Housing assistance.(d)Pursuant to this section and upon agreement to accept funding from the Recidivism Reduction Fund, the board of supervisors, in collaboration with the county’s Community Corrections Partnership, shall grant funds allocated to the county, as described in subdivision (a), to community recidivism and crime reduction service providers based on the needs of their community.(e)(1)The amount awarded to each community recidivism and crime reduction service provider by a county shall be based on the population of the county, as projected by the Department of Finance, and shall not exceed the following for each Budget Act allocation:(A)One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in a county with a population of over 4,000,000 people.(B)Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in a county with a population of 700,000 or more people but less than 4,000,000 people.(C)Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in a county with a population of 400,000 or more people but less than 700,000 people.(D)Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in a county with a population of less than 400,000 people.(2)The total amount of grants awarded to a single community recidivism and crime reduction service provider by all counties pursuant to this section shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per Budget Act allocation.(f)The board of supervisors, in collaboration with the county’s Community Corrections Partnership, shall establish minimum requirements, funding criteria, and procedures for the counties to award grants consistent with the criteria established in this section.(g)A community recidivism and crime reduction service provider that receives a grant under this section shall report to the county board of supervisors or the Community Corrections Partnership on the number of individuals served and the types of services provided, consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). The board of supervisors or the Community Corrections Partnership shall report to the Board of State and Community Corrections any information received under this subdivision from grant recipients.(h)Of the total amount granted to a county, up to 5 percent may be withheld by the board of supervisors or the Community Corrections Partnership for the payment of administrative costs.(i)Any funds allocated to a county under this section shall be available for expenditure for a period of four years and any unexpended funds shall revert to the state General Fund at the end of the four-year period.SEC. 6. Section 2053.1 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2053.1. (a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall implement in every state prison literacy programs that are designed to ensure that upon parole inmates are able to achieve the goals contained in this section. The department shall prepare an implementation plan for this program, and shall request the necessary funds to implement this program as follows:(1) The department shall offer academic programming throughout an inmate’s incarceration that shall focus on increasing the reading ability of an inmate to at least a 9th grade level.(2) For an inmate reading at a 9th grade level or higher, the department shall focus on helping the inmate obtain a general education development certificate, or its equivalent, or a high school diploma.(3) (A) (i) The department shall make college programs available at every state prison for the benefit of inmates who have obtained a general education development certificate or equivalent or a high school diploma. The college programs shall only be provided by the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, or other						regionally accredited, accredited public or nonprofit colleges or universities.(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, “regionally accredited, “accredited public or nonprofit colleges or universities” means nonpublic higher education institutions that grant undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both and that are either public or formed as nonprofit corporations in this their state and that are regionally accredited by an accreditation agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.(B) The department shall prioritize colleges and universities that:(i) Provide face-to-face, classroom-based instruction.(ii) Provide comprehensive in-person student supports, including counseling, advising, tutoring, and library services.(iii) Offer transferable degree-building pathways.(iv) Facilitate real-time student-to-student interaction and learning.(v) Coordinate with other colleges and universities serving students in the department so that inmate students who are transferred to another institution can continue building toward a degree or credential.(vi) Coordinate with the California Community Colleges Rising Scholars Network, the California State University Project Rebound Consortium, the University of California Underground Scholars Initiative, or other nonprofit postsecondary programs specifically serving formerly incarcerated students so that incarcerated students who are paroled receive support to continue building toward a degree or credential.(vii) Do not charge incarcerated students or their families for tuition, course materials, or other educational components.(viii) Waive or offer grant aid to cover tuition, course materials, or other educational components for incarcerated students.(C) Accredited postsecondary education providers shall be responsible for:(i) Determining and developing their curricula and degree pathways.(ii) Determining certificate pathways, in consultation with, and with the approval of, the department.(iii) Providing instructional staff and academic advising or counseling staff.(iv) Determining what specific services, including, but not limited to tutoring, academic counseling, library, and career advising, shall be offered to ensure incarcerated students can successfully complete their course of study.(D) An inmate who is enrolled, pursuant to this section, in a full-time college program consisting of 12 semester units, or the academic quarter equivalent thereof, of credit-bearing courses leading to an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree shall be deemed by the department to be assigned to degree-granting college or university program equivalent to full-time postsecondary enrollment, as defined by state regulations for the respective degree, shall receive the same privileges as an inmate with a full-time work or training assignment.(E) Subparagraph (B) does not prevent an inmate from enrolling on their own, independent of the department, in a postsecondary education course that does not meet the criteria specified in that subparagraph.(4) While the department shall offer education to target populations, priority shall be given to those with a criminogenic need for education, those who have a need based on their educational achievement level, or other factors as determined by the department.(b) In complying with the requirements of this section, the department shall give strong consideration to the use of libraries and librarians, computer-assisted training, and other innovations that have proven to be effective in reducing illiteracy among disadvantaged adults.SEC. 7. Section 5007.3 of the Penal Code is amended to read:5007.3. (a) (1) The department shall establish the California Reentry and Enrichment (CARE) Grant program to provide grants to community based community-based organizations (CBOs) that provide rehabilitative services to incarcerated individuals.(2) Grants shall be awarded by the steering committee established pursuant to subdivision (b) based on the following criteria:(A) The steering committee shall prioritize the continuation, expansion, or replication of rehabilitative programs that have previously demonstrated success with incarcerated individuals within a correctional environment. This subparagraph does not disqualify a relatively new CBO that has programming that shows promise from applying for, or receiving, a grant.(B) Grants shall be awarded to fund programs that provide insight-oriented restorative justice and offender accountability programs that can demonstrate that the approach has produced, or will produce, positive outcomes in department facilities, including, but not limited to:(i) Increasing empathy and mindfulness.(ii) Increasing resilience and reducing the impacts of stress and trauma.(iii) Reducing violence in the form of physical aggression, verbal aggression, anger, and hostility.(iv) Successfully addressing and treating the symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder.(v) Victim impacts and understanding.(C) To the extent that the information is available, applicants shall provide evaluations and surveys, including qualitative and quantitative information, from current and former program participants and any program evaluation data conducted by an outside research organization.(b) The department shall establish a CARE Grant program steering committee, which shall establish grant criteria, select grant recipients, and determine grant amounts and the number of grants. Members of the steering committee shall be chosen as a result of consultation with the Senate and Assembly, as follows:(1) One member shall be an educator or trainer in the field of criminal justice, with specific knowledge and experience working with adult offenders.(2) One member shall be a researcher with specific expertise evaluating the effectiveness of rehabilitative treatment for adult offenders.(3) Two members shall be representatives for community based community-based organizations with experience working with the department on CBO-led programs. The CBO representative is ineligible to apply for a grant and shall not receive any compensation from another nonprofit/CBO that receives a CARE grant.(4) Two members shall have firsthand knowledge of rehabilitative CBO- or department-led programming through active participation and completion of courses within the preceding five years. These members are ineligible to apply for a grant and shall not receive any compensation from another nonprofit or CBO that receives a CARE grant.(5) Two members shall be representatives of the Division of Rehabilitative Programs within the department who have had experience working directly with CBO programs.(6) One member shall be a representative from the Division of Adult Institutions to provide insight and knowledge of the most effective CBO programs.(7)One member shall be from the Office of the Inspector General who is familiar with the work and objectives of the California Rehabilitation Oversight Board.(c) Prior to the release of the grant application, the department shall survey all adult prisons to determine which are able to support new programs provided by the grantees. A list of prisons that are able to add additional programs shall be clearly listed in the request for applications. All prisons that agree to accept additional programs, agree to facilitate and support the grantee organizations in the provision of those programs. Once grant applications are selected by the committee, should a prison determine that the specific programs cannot safely or adequately be provided in their particular prison, the Division of Adult Institutions, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide detailed information, in writing, to the steering committee on the specific reasons for being unable to offer the program.(d) To the extent amendments are made to a contract, after the contract is awarded, that result in a significant change in the level of service provided by a grantee, the department shall submit the contract amendment to the steering committee for approval prior to executing the amendment.(e) Each member of the steering committee shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day in which that committee member is engaged in the performance of official duties. The performance of official duties includes all meetings, reviewing draft application and scoring documents, reading and evaluating grant applications, and any prison visits agreed to by the committee to review grantee programs. Total compensation shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per committee member, per year. A government employee who is participating in the committee as part of their job and is continuing to receive their regular salary is not eligible for compensation. In addition to the compensation, all members of the committee shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties. Any costs pursuant to this subdivision will be paid from CARE grant funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act.SEC. 8. Section 5068.5 of the Penal Code is amended to read:5068.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), any person employed or under contract to provide diagnostic, treatment, or other mental health services in the state or to supervise or provide consultation on these services in the state correctional system shall be a physician and surgeon, a psychologist, or other health or mental health professional, licensed to practice in this state.(b) Notwithstanding Section 5068 or Section 704 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, 5068, the following persons are exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a), so long as they continue in employment in the same class and in the same department:(1) Persons employed on January 1, 1985, as psychologists to provide diagnostic or treatment services, including those persons on authorized leave, but not including intermittent personnel.(2) Persons employed on January 1, 1989, to supervise or provide consultation on the diagnostic or treatment services, including persons on authorized leave, but not including intermittent personnel.(c) (1) (A) The requirements of subdivision (a) may be waived by the secretary solely for persons in the professions of psychology or psychology, clinical social work work, marriage and family therapy, or professional clinical counseling who are gaining qualifying experience for licensure in those professions in this state. Providers working in a licensed health care facility operated by the department shall receive also obtain a waiver in accordance with Section 1277 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “qualifying experience” means experience that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 2914 of, or Section 4996.23 of, Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991), or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(2) A waiver granted pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed four years from commencement of the employment in this state in a position that includes qualifying experience, at which time licensure shall have been obtained or the employment shall be terminated, except that an extension of a waiver of licensure may be granted for one additional year, based on extenuating circumstances determined by the department pursuant to subdivision (d). For persons employed as psychologists or psychologists, clinical social workers workers, marriage and family therapists, or professional clinical counselors less than full time, an extension of a waiver of licensure may be granted for additional years proportional to the extent of part-time employment, as long as the person is employed without interruption in service, but in no case shall the waiver of licensure exceed five years in the case of psychologists or six years in the case of clinical social workers or five years in the case of psychologists. workers, marriage and family therapists, or professional clinical counselors. However, this durational limitation upon waivers shall not apply to active candidates for a doctoral degree in social work, social welfare, or social science who are enrolled at an accredited university, college, or professional school, but these limitations shall apply following completion of that training.(3) A waiver pursuant to this subdivision shall be granted only to the extent necessary to qualify for licensure, except that personnel recruited for employment from outside this state and whose experience is sufficient to gain admission to a licensure examination shall nevertheless have one year from the date of their employment in California to become licensed, at which time licensure shall have been obtained or the employment shall be terminated, provided that the employee shall take the licensure examination at the earliest possible date after the date of the employee’s employment, and if the employee does not pass the examination at that time, the employee shall have a second opportunity to pass the next possible examination, subject to the one-year limit.(d) The department shall grant a request for an extension of a waiver of licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) based on extenuating circumstances if any of the following circumstances exist:(1) The person requesting the extension has experienced a recent catastrophic event that may impair the person’s ability to qualify for and pass the licensure examination. Those events may include, but are not limited to, significant hardship caused by a natural disaster; serious and prolonged illness of the person; serious and prolonged illness or death of a child, spouse, or parent; or other stressful circumstances.(2) The person requesting the extension has difficulty speaking or writing the English language, or other cultural and ethnic factors exist that substantially impair the person’s ability to qualify for and pass the license examination.(3) The person requesting the extension has experienced other personal hardship that the department, in its discretion, determines to warrant the extension.SEC. 9. Section 6006 of the Penal Code is amended to read:6006. The Department of Corrections, Department of the Youth Authority, Board of Prison Terms, and Youthful Offender Parole Board, in conjunction with the State Department of Health Services, shall meet and confer with recognized employee organizations representing employees pursuant to the Ralph C. Dills Act, Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop rules regarding the mandatory examination or testing for tuberculosis of the staff of the Department of Corrections, Department of the Youth Authority, Board of Prison Terms, and Youthful Offender Parole Board. department. These rules shall include mandated annual examination for tuberculosis of all employees with inmate contact employees whose primary job functions require them to work inside an institution and as a part of preemployment requirements. Except as provided in Section 6007, the confidentiality of the test results shall be maintained. However, statistical summaries which that do not identify specific individuals may be prepared.SEC. 10. Section 6006.5 of the Penal Code is repealed.6006.5.For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(a)“Department” means the Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, the Board of Prison Terms, or the Youthful Offender Parole Board.(b)“Examination or test” means methods, processes, or other means, including a chest X-ray, conducted in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and as specified in the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control, to determine if a person has, has had, or has been exposed to tuberculosis.(c)“Medical evaluation” means taking a history or gathering other information and may include, but is not limited to, listening to the chest or other examinations or tests, as specified in the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control, used to diagnose and assess the health conditions of the person.(d)“Followup care” means the continued medical evaluations, monitoring, or care of a person after his or her initial visit, examination, or test, including, but not limited to, preventive therapy.(e)“Certificate” means the official document developed and issued by the department that indicates the absence of tuberculosis in an infectious stage and that is signed by a physician and surgeon who is licensed by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code or his or her designee. The certificate shall indicate that the examination, test, or evaluation was performed in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and as specified in the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control.(f)“Negative skin test” shall have the same meaning as it is defined by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control as the definition reads at the time of the examination.(g)“Positive skin test” shall have the same meaning as it is defined by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control as the definition reads at the time of the examination.(h)“Institution” means any state prison, camp, center, office, or other facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority.(i)“Infectious or contagious stage” means the period when a disease is capable of being transmitted from one person to another with or without contact.(j)“Tuberculosis converter” shall have the same meaning as it is defined by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.SEC. 11. Section 6006.5 is added to the Penal Code, to read:6006.5. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Annual TB screening” means a yearly risk assessment to determine the presence of tuberculosis (TB) symptoms in an individual.(b) “Baseline TB screening and testing” means a process that includes an individual TB risk assessment and an initial TB test, as defined by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).(c) “Certificate” means a document signed by a licensed health care professional or their designee. The certificate shall indicate that the baseline TB screening and testing, annual TB screening, or medical evaluation was performed in accordance with the recommendations of the federal CDC.(d) “Department” means the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(e) “Follow up care” means continued medical evaluations or treatment of a person after their initial baseline TB screening and testing or annual TB screening.(f) “Institution” means any state prison, camp, or other facility where incarcerated persons are housed under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(g) “Medical evaluation” means a gathering of patient information by a licensed health care professional, which may include, but is not limited to, a comprehensive history, physical examination, or tests in accordance with the recommendations of the federal CDC used to diagnose, assess, and treat TB.SEC. 12. Section 6007 of the Penal Code is repealed.6007.(a)No person shall be employed initially by the department unless that person, after an offer of employment, completes an examination, a test, or a medical evaluation and is found to be free of tuberculosis in an infectious or contagious stage prior to assuming work duties.(b)As a condition of continued employment with the department, those employees who are skin-test negative shall receive an examination or test at least once a year, or more often if directed by the department, for as long as the employee remains skin-test negative. If an employee has a documented positive skin test, the employee shall have a medical evaluation to determine the need for followup care. An employee with a positive skin test shall follow the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control.(c)The department shall ensure that all examinations or tests and medical evaluations, as defined in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 6006.5, to diagnose and assess the health conditions of the person, meet the following conditions:(1)Are made available to the employee promptly at a reasonable time and place.(2)Are made available at no cost to the employee.(3)Are performed by, or under the supervision of, a licensed health care professional.(d)The examinations or tests or medical evaluations required pursuant to this chapter shall be offered by the department. The department may contract with a medical provider to administer the examinations or tests or medical evaluations. Employees who elect not to accept the department’s offer shall obtain the examinations or tests or medical evaluations through their personal health care providers at no cost to the department.The requirements of this section apply to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Board of Parole Hearings. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each department or board shall be responsible for the costs of the testing or evaluation required by this section for its own employees or potential employees.(e)Followup care for tuberculosis infection or treatment for tuberculosis disease shall be pursued through the workers’ compensation system as provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of the Labor Code for job-related incidents or through the employee’s health insurance plan for non-job-related incidents. The department shall file a first report of injury for an employee whose examination or test for tuberculosis is positive. In addition, the department shall follow the guidelines, policies, and procedures of the workers’ compensation early intervention program pursuant to Section 3214 of the Labor Code.(f)Each employee, including employees who are employed initially, shall submit a signed certificate to the department annually that may be reviewed by the chief medical officer of the department.(g)The department shall maintain a file containing an up-to-date certificate for each employee.(h)Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from requiring and providing more extensive or more frequent examinations or tests.(i)The department shall not discriminate against any employee because the employee tested positive for tuberculosis.(j)All volunteers of the department shall be required to furnish the department with a certificate prior to assuming their volunteer duties and annually thereafter, showing that the volunteer has been examined and found to be free of tuberculosis in an infectious or contagious stage.(k)The department shall maintain a file containing an up-to-date certificate for each volunteer.(l)Employees from other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Department of State Hospitals and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, who are assigned to work in an institution, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 6006.5, or who are assigned to work with inmates or wards on a regular basis, as defined in the department’s guidelines, shall comply with the following requirements:(1)Receive an examination or test prior to assuming their duties and at least once a year thereafter, or more often if directed by the department, for as long as the employee remains skin-test negative.(2)Receive a medical evaluation to determine the need for followup care and follow the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control if an employee has a documented positive skin test.(3)Submit a signed certificate to the department prior to assuming his or her duties and annually thereafter, showing that the employee has been found to be free of tuberculosis in an infectious or contagious state.(4)Pursue followup care for tuberculosis infection or treatment for tuberculosis disease through the appropriate programs in their agency or department.(m)The department shall offer the examinations, tests, or medical evaluations required pursuant to this chapter to employees of other state agencies or departments and may contract with a medical provider to administer the examinations, tests, or medical evaluations. Employees of other state agencies or departments who elect not to accept the department’s offer shall obtain the examinations, tests, or medical evaluations from their personal health care provider at no cost to the department.(n)The department shall maintain a file containing an up-to-date certificate for each employee from other state agencies who works in an institution.SEC. 13. Section 6007 is added to the Penal Code, to read:6007. (a) A person who is employed by the department and whose primary job functions require them to work inside an institution shall complete baseline TB screening and testing and shall provide a certificate to the department within seven days of appointment to their position showing they are free of active tuberculosis. The employee shall not be allowed to perform any job duties within a licensed area within the institution until the certificate has been submitted and accepted by the department.(b) (1) An employee whose primary job functions require them to work inside an institution shall receive annual TB screening and ensure that certificates are submitted and accepted by the department showing they are free of active tuberculosis. If an employee is suspected of having active tuberculosis during an annual TB screening, the employee shall have a medical evaluation to determine the need for follow up care in accordance with the recommendations of the federal CDC.(2) The department may require more frequent TB screening or testing, including skin or blood tests, if there is a known exposure or ongoing transmission within an institution.(c) The department shall ensure that all annual TB screenings are:(1) Offered to the employee promptly at a reasonable time and place.(2) Offered at no cost to the employee.(3) Performed by, or under the supervision of, a licensed health care professional.(d) The department may contract with a licensed health care professional to administer the baseline TB screening and testing, annual TB screening, or medical evaluations. An employee who declines the department’s offer of these services shall obtain the services through their personal licensed health care providers at no cost to the department.(e) Follow up care for tuberculosis shall be pursued through the workers’ compensation system as provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of the Labor Code for job-related incidents or through the employee’s health insurance plan for non-job-related incidents. The department shall file a report for an employee whose test or medical evaluation for tuberculosis is positive. In addition, the department shall follow the guidelines, policies, and procedures of the workers’ compensation early intervention program pursuant to Section 3214 of the Labor Code.(f) The department shall maintain a file containing an up-to-date certificate for each employee.SEC. 14. Section 6008 of the Penal Code is repealed.6008.The Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, the Board of Prison Terms, and the Youthful Offender Parole Board shall report to the State Department of Health Services the results of the tuberculosis examinations required by Section 6006.SEC. 15. Section 6027 of the Penal Code is amended to read:6027. (a) It shall be the duty of the Board of State and Community Corrections to collect and maintain available information and data about state and community correctional policies, practices, capacities, and needs, including, but not limited to, prevention, intervention, suppression, supervision, and incapacitation, as they relate to both adult corrections, juvenile justice, and gang problems. The board shall seek to collect and make publicly available up-to-date data and information reflecting the impact of state and community correctional, juvenile justice, and gang-related policies and practices enacted in the state, as well as information and data concerning promising and evidence-based practices from other jurisdictions.(b) Consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 6024, the board shall also:(1) Develop recommendations for the improvement of criminal justice and delinquency and gang prevention activity throughout the state.(2) Identify, promote, and provide technical assistance relating to evidence-based programs, practices, and promising and innovative projects consistent with the mission of the board.(3) Develop definitions of key terms, including, but not limited to, “recidivism,” “average daily population,” “treatment program completion rates,” and any other terms deemed relevant in order to facilitate consistency in local data collection, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based practices, promising evidence-based practices, and evidence-based programs. In developing these definitions, the board shall consult with the following stakeholders and experts:(A) A county supervisor or county administrative officer, selected after conferring with the California State Association of Counties.(B) A county sheriff, selected after conferring with the California State Sheriffs’ Association.(C) A chief probation officer, selected after conferring with the Chief Probation Officers of California.(D) A district attorney, selected after conferring with the California District Attorneys Association.(E) A public defender, selected after conferring with the California Public Defenders Association.(F) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(G) A representative from the Administrative Office of the Courts.(H) A representative from a nonpartisan, nonprofit policy institute with experience and involvement in research and data relating to California’s criminal justice system.(I) A representative from a nonprofit agency providing comprehensive reentry services.(4) Receive and disburse federal funds, and perform all necessary and appropriate services in the performance of its duties as established by federal acts.(5) Develop comprehensive, unified, and orderly procedures to ensure that applications for grants are processed fairly, efficiently, and in a manner consistent with the mission of the board.(6) Identify delinquency and gang intervention and prevention grants that have the same or similar program purpose, are allocated to the same entities, serve the same target populations, and have the same desired outcomes for the purpose of consolidating grant funds and programs and moving toward a unified single delinquency intervention and prevention grant application process in adherence with all applicable federal guidelines and mandates.(7) Cooperate with and render technical assistance to the Legislature, state agencies, units of general local government, combinations of those units, or other public or private agencies, organizations, or institutions in matters relating to criminal justice and delinquency prevention.(8) Develop incentives for units of local government to develop comprehensive regional partnerships whereby adjacent jurisdictions pool grant funds in order to deliver services, such as job training and employment opportunities, to a broader target population, including at-promise youth, and maximize the impact of state funds at the local level.(9) Conduct evaluation studies of the programs and activities assisted by the federal acts.(10) Identify and evaluate state, local, and federal gang and youth violence suppression, intervention, and prevention programs and strategies, along with funding for those efforts. The board shall assess and make recommendations for the coordination of the state’s programs, strategies, and funding that address gang and youth violence in a manner that maximizes the effectiveness and coordination of those programs, strategies, and resources. By January 1, 2014, the board shall develop funding allocation policies to ensure that within three years no less than 70 percent of funding for gang and youth violence suppression, intervention, and prevention programs and strategies is used in programs that utilize promising and proven evidence-based principles and practices. The board shall communicate with local agencies and programs in an effort to promote the best evidence-based principles and practices for addressing gang and youth violence through suppression, intervention, and prevention.(11) The board shall collect from each county the plan submitted pursuant to Section 1230.1 within two months of adoption by the county boards of supervisors. Commencing January 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the board shall collect and analyze available data regarding the implementation of the local plans and other outcome-based measures, as defined by the board in consultation with the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and the California State Sheriffs’ Association. By July 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the board shall provide to the Governor and the Legislature a report on the implementation of the plans described above.(12) Commencing on and after July 1, 2012, the board, in consultation with the Administrative Office of the Courts, the California State Association of Counties, the California State Sheriffs’ Association, and the Chief Probation Officers of California, shall support the development and implementation of first phase baseline and ongoing data collection instruments to reflect the local impact of Chapter 15 of the Statutes of 2011, specifically related to dispositions for felony offenders and postrelease community supervision. The board shall make any data collected pursuant to this paragraph available on the board’s internet website. It is the intent of the Legislature that the board promote collaboration and the reduction of duplication of data collection and reporting efforts where possible.(c) The board may do either of the following:(1) Collect, evaluate, publish, and disseminate statistics and other information on the condition and progress of criminal justice in the state.(2) Perform other functions and duties as required by federal acts, rules, regulations, or guidelines in acting as the administrative office of the state planning agency for distribution of federal grants.(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to include, in the provisions set forth in this section, funds already designated to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 30025 of the Government Code.SEC. 16. Section 6044 of the Penal Code is repealed.6044.(a)The Council on Criminal Justice and Behavioral Health is hereby established within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The council shall be composed of 12 members, one of whom shall be the secretary of the department who shall be designated as the chairperson, one of whom shall be the Director of State Hospitals, one of whom shall be the Director of Health Care Services, and nine of whom shall be appointed. The Governor shall appoint three members, at least one of whom shall represent behavioral health. The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint two members, one representing law enforcement and one representing behavioral health. The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint two members, one representing law enforcement and one representing behavioral health. The Attorney General shall appoint one member. The Chief Justice of the California Supreme Court shall appoint one member who shall be a superior court judge. When selecting appointments, experience with the criminal justice or behavioral health systems, or both, either personally, as a family member, or as a caregiver, is encouraged.(b)The council shall select a vice chairperson from among its members. Six members of the council shall constitute a quorum.(c)The Director of State Hospitals and the Director of Health Care Services shall serve as the liaison to the California Health and Human Services Agency and any departments within that agency necessary to further the purposes of this article.(d)Members of the council shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. For purposes of compensation, attendance at meetings of the board shall be deemed performance by a member of the duties of his or her state or local government employment.(e)The goal of the council shall be to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with behavioral health disorders who are likely to become offenders or who have a history of offending. The council shall:(1)Identify strategies for preventing adults and juveniles with behavioral health needs from becoming offenders.(2)Identify strategies for improving the cost-effectiveness of services for adults and juveniles with behavioral health needs who have a history of offending.(3)Identify incentives to encourage state and local criminal justice, juvenile justice, and behavioral health programs to adopt cost-effective approaches for serving adults and juveniles with behavioral health needs who are likely to offend or who have a history of offending.(f)The council shall consider strategies that:(1)Improve service coordination among state and local behavioral health, criminal justice, and juvenile justice programs.(2)Improve the ability of adult and juvenile offenders with behavioral health needs to transition successfully between corrections-based, juvenile justice-based, and community-based treatment programs.(g)The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Director of State Hospitals, and the Director of Health Care Services may furnish for the use of the council those facilities, supplies, and personnel as may be available therefor. The council may secure the assistance of any state agency, department, or instrumentality in the course of its work.(h)(1)The Council on Criminal Justice and Behavioral Health shall file with the Legislature, not later than December 31 of each year, a report that shall provide details of the council’s activities during the preceding year. The report shall include recommendations for improving the cost-effectiveness of behavioral health and criminal justice programs.(2)After the first year of operation, the council may recommend to the Legislature and Governor modifications to its jurisdiction, composition, and membership that will further the purposes of this article.(i)The Council on Criminal Justice and Behavioral Health is authorized to apply for any funds that may be available from the federal government or other sources to further the purposes of this article.(j)(1)For purposes of this article, the council shall address the needs of adults and juveniles who meet the following criteria: persons who have been arrested, detained, incarcerated, or are at a significant risk of being arrested, detained, or incarcerated, and who have a mental disorder as defined in Section 1830.205 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations or who receive substance use disorder services as defined in Section 51341.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations that have been determined to be medically necessary pursuant to Section 51303 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, or both.(2)The council may expand its purview to allow it to identify strategies that are preventive in nature and could be directed to identifiable categories of adults and juveniles that fall outside of the above definitions.SEC. 17. Section 6126 of the Penal Code is amended to read:6126. (a) The Inspector General shall be responsible for contemporaneous oversight of internal affairs investigations and the disciplinary process of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, pursuant to Section 6133 under policies to be developed by the Inspector General.(b) When requested by the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, or the Speaker of the Assembly, the Inspector General shall initiate an audit or review of policies, practices, and procedures of the department. The Inspector General may, under policies developed by the Inspector General, initiate an audit or review on the Inspector General’s own accord. Following a completed audit or review, the Inspector General may perform a followup follow-up audit or review to determine what measures the department implemented to address the Inspector General’s findings and to assess the effectiveness of those measures.(c) (1) Upon completion of an audit or review pursuant to subdivision (b), the Inspector General shall prepare a complete written report, which may be held as confidential and disclosed in confidence, along with all underlying materials the Inspector General deems appropriate, to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and to the requesting entity in subdivision (b), where applicable.(2) The Inspector General shall also prepare a public report. When necessary, the public report shall differ from the complete written report in the respect that the Inspector General shall have the discretion to redact or otherwise protect the names of individuals, specific locations, or other facts that, if not redacted, might hinder prosecution related to the review, compromise the safety and security of staff, inmates, or members of the public, or where disclosure of the information is otherwise prohibited by law, and to decline to produce any of the underlying materials. Copies of public reports shall be posted on the Office of the Inspector General’s internet website.(d) The Inspector General shall, during the course of an audit or review, identify areas of full and partial compliance, or noncompliance, with departmental policies and procedures, specify deficiencies in the completion and documentation of processes, and recommend corrective actions, including, but not limited to, additional training, additional policies, or changes in policy, as well as any other findings or recommendations that the Inspector General deems appropriate.(e) The Inspector General, pursuant to Section 6126.6, shall review the Governor’s candidates for appointment to serve as warden for the state’s adult correctional institutions and as superintendents for the state’s juvenile facilities.(f) The Inspector General shall conduct an objective, clinically appropriate, and metric-oriented medical inspection program to periodically review delivery of medical care at each state prison.(g)The Inspector General shall conduct an objective, metric-oriented oversight and inspection program to periodically review delivery of the reforms identified in the document released by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in April 2012, entitled The Future of California Corrections: A Blueprint to Save Billions of Dollars, End Federal Court Oversight, and Improve the Prison System (the blueprint), including, but not limited to, the following specific goals and reforms described by the blueprint:(1)Whether the department has increased the percentage of inmates served in rehabilitative programs to 70 percent of the department’s target population prior to their release.(2)The establishment of an adherence to the standardized staffing model at each institution.(3)The establishment of an adherence to the new inmate classification score system.(4)The establishment of and adherence to the new prison gang management system, including changes to the department’s current policies for identifying prison-based gang members and associates and the use and conditions associated with the department’s security housing units.(5)The implementation of and adherence to the Comprehensive Housing Plan described in the blueprint.(h)(g) The Inspector General shall, in consultation with the Department of Finance, develop a methodology for producing a workload budget to be used for annually adjusting the budget of the Office of the Inspector General, beginning with the budget for the 2005–06 fiscal year.(i)(h) The Inspector General shall provide contemporaneous oversight of grievances that fall within the department’s process for reviewing and investigating inmate allegations of staff misconduct and other specialty grievances, examining compliance with regulations, department policy, and best practices. This contemporaneous oversight shall be completed within the Inspector General’s budget excluding resources that, beginning in the Budget Act of 2019, were provided to restore the Inspector General’s ability to initiate an audit or review pursuant to subdivision (a). The contemporaneous oversight shall be completed in a way that does not unnecessarily slow the department’s review and investigation of inmate allegations of staff misconduct and other specialty grievances. The Inspector General shall issue reports annually, beginning in 2021.(j)(i) The Inspector General shall monitor the department’s process for reviewing uses of force and shall issue reports annually.SEC. 18. Section 6126.3 of the Penal Code is amended to read:6126.3. (a) The Inspector General shall not destroy any papers or memoranda used to support a completed review within three years after a report is released.(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), all books, papers, records, and correspondence of the office pertaining to its work are public records subject to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code and shall be filed at any of the regularly maintained offices of the Inspector General.(c) The following books, papers, records, and correspondence of the Office of the Inspector General pertaining to its work are not public records subject to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, nor shall they be subject to discovery pursuant to any provision of Title 3 (commencing with Section 1985) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 19570) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code in any manner:(1) All reports, papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents that are otherwise exempt from disclosure pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 6126.5, Section 6126.6, subdivision (c) of Section 6128, subdivision (c) of Section 6126, or all other applicable laws regarding confidentiality, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act, the Public Safety Officers’ Procedural Bill of Rights, the Information Practices Act of 1977, the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act of 1977, and the provisions of Section 832.7, relating to the disposition notification for complaints against peace officers.(2) Any papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents pertaining to any audit or review that has not been completed.(3) Any papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents pertaining to internal discussions between the Inspector General and the Inspector General’s staff, or between staff members of the Inspector General, or any personal notes of the Inspector General or the Inspector General’s staff.(4) All identifying information, and any personal papers or correspondence from any person requesting assistance from the Inspector General, except in those cases where the Inspector General determines that disclosure of the information is necessary in the interests of justice.(5) Any papers, correspondence, memoranda, electronic communications, or other documents pertaining to contemporaneous public oversight pursuant to Section 6133 or subdivision (i) or (j) (h) or (i) of Section 6126.SEC. 19. Section 6140 of the Penal Code is repealed.6140.There is in the Office of the Inspector General the California Rehabilitation Oversight Board (C-ROB). The board shall consist of the 11 members as follows:(a)The Inspector General, who shall serve as chair.(b)The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(c)The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or his or her designee.(d)The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or his or her designee.(e)The Director of Health Care Services, or his or her designee.(f)The Director of State Hospitals, or his or her designee.(g)A faculty member of the University of California who has expertise in rehabilitation of criminal offenders, appointed by the President of the University of California.(h)A faculty member of the California State University, who has expertise in rehabilitation of criminal offenders, appointed by the Chancellor of the California State University.(i)A county sheriff, appointed by the Governor.(j)A county chief probation officer, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.(k)A local government official who provides mental health, substance abuse, or educational services to criminal offenders, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.SEC. 20. Section 6141 of the Penal Code is repealed.6141.The California Rehabilitation Oversight Board shall meet at least twice annually, and shall regularly examine the various mental health, substance abuse, educational, and employment programs for incarcerated persons and parolees operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The board shall examine the department’s effort to assist incarcerated persons and parolees to obtain postrelease health care coverage. The board shall also examine efforts to address the housing needs of incarcerated persons, including those who are identified as having serious mental health needs, who are released to the community as parolees. The board shall report to the Governor and the Legislature annually, on October 15, and may submit other reports during the year if it finds they are necessary. The reports shall include, but are not limited to, findings on the effectiveness of treatment efforts, rehabilitation needs of incarcerated persons, gaps in rehabilitation services in the department, levels of incarcerated person participation and success in the programs, data indicating the number of parolees who are experiencing homelessness, and the number of those parolees experiencing homelessness who have previously been identified as having serious mental health needs. The board shall also make recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature with respect to modifications, additions, and eliminations of rehabilitation and treatment programs. In performing its duties, the board shall use the work products developed for the department as a result of the provisions of the 2006 Budget Act, including Provision 18 of Item 5225-001-0001.SEC. 21. Article 2.45 (commencing with Section 11073) is added to Chapter 1 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code, to read: Article 2.45. Tribal Police Pilot Program11073. (a) The Tribal Police Pilot Program is hereby established to operate from July 1, 2026, until July 1, 2029, under the direction of the Department of Justice and the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.(b) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, any qualified entity may notify the department that they wish to enroll in the pilot program and, upon verification by the department, in coordination with the commission, that the entity has complied with the requirements prescribed in subdivision (d), any qualified member of that entity shall be deemed a peace officer as provided in Section 830.83.(c) (1) A person shall not be a qualified member unless the person completes and maintains all applicable requirements for the appointment, training, education, hiring, eligibility, and certification required for peace officers under state law, including, without limitation, those described in Sections 832 and 832.55 and any regulations adopted thereunder.(2) A qualified member is subject to the requirements of Sections 13500 to 13519.15, inclusive, of this code, Sections 1029, 1030, 1031, and 1031.4 of the Government Code, and any regulations adopted thereto.(3) A qualified entity designating a person as a peace officer pursuant to this program shall document that person’s compliance with this subdivision and Section 832.55 and submit that documentation to the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.(d) A qualified entity enrolled in this pilot program shall do all of the following:(1) Enact and maintain in continuous force a tribal law or resolution expressing their intent that tribal officers participating in this pilot program be California peace officers, and that the qualified entity be similarly situated to a California local law enforcement agency employing California peace officers, and adopting any requirements prescribed by this section and Sections 830.83 and 832.55.(2) Adopt and maintain in continuous force for a period of no less than three years after the conclusion of the pilot program, tribal law that provides public access to records, and related procedures and remedies substantively identical to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) as to any record related to this pilot program. Such records include, without limitation, any record related to conduct specified in Section 832.7 by a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to this program, including any administrative record of the tribe specifically related to such conduct.(3) Adopt and maintain in continuous force tribal law that provides procedures and remedies substantively identical to the Government Claims Act (Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code) for any claim arising from any actions or omissions of a tribal police officer acting as a California peace officer pursuant to this program.(4) Adopt and maintain in continuous force for no less than three years after the conclusion of the pilot program, tribal law that contains all of the following:(A) A clear and unequivocal limited waiver of tribal sovereign immunity against any suit, liability, and judgment, including the full enforcement of judgments and collections for a peace officer designated pursuant to this program, in connection with any act or omission arising out of the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot program, including, but not limited to, any act or omission by a tribal law enforcement officer exercising, or purporting to exercise, the authority granted by Section 830.83.(B) An express agreement that the substantive and procedural laws of the State of California or of the United States, as applicable to California peace officers and their employers, shall govern any claim, suit, or regulatory or administrative action, and that the obligations, rights, and remedies shall be determined in accordance with those laws, and by the courts of the State of California or of the federal government, as applicable. This clause does not limit the jurisdiction of the court of a tribe, but the qualified entity shall clearly and unequivocally waive any right to require the exhaustion of remedies in a tribal court in connection with this pilot program.(C) An express acknowledgment of the Attorney General’s inherent authority over the peace officers and law enforcement agencies of the state pursuant to Section 13 of Article V of the California Constitution and a grant of authority over tribal law enforcement agencies to the Attorney General for the duration of the pilot program or later if there is an ongoing inspection, audit, review, or investigation.(D) An express agreement that the qualified entity and its officers, employees, and other agents shall cooperate with any inspections, audits, and investigations by the Department of Justice or the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training in connection with the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot program, including any sanction or discipline imposed by the department or commission, up to and including removal of the qualified entity from the pilot program described in this section. This section shall not limit the Attorney General’s authority pursuant to Section 52.3 of the Civil Code and Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to investigate a tribal law enforcement agency participating in this pilot program or to prosecute any action resulting from their participation.(E) (i) A requirement for the qualified entity to carry sufficient insurance coverage for the liability of the qualified entity and its officers, employees, and other agents arising out of the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot program.(ii) The department shall determine, in consultation with the qualified entity, the amount of coverage that is sufficient for the requirement in clause (i).(5) Comply with all applicable provisions of Section 832.5 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13500) of Title 4, including all applicable remedies.(6) Submit all required documentation of compliance with this subdivision to the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, in a manner and form prescribed by the commission.(7) Submit any data, statistics, reports, or other information requested by the Department of Justice for the monitoring and evaluation of the pilot program to the department in a manner and form prescribed by the department.(8) Comply with all applicable provisions of Sections 13012, 13020 to 13023, inclusive, 13730, 13777, and 13519.4 of this code, Sections 7284.6, 12525, 12525.2, and 12525.5 of the Government Code, and any implementing regulations thereof, and all applicable remedies.(9) Comply with any investigation or review by the Attorney General required under Section 12525.3 of the Government Code.(10) Adopt and maintain in continuous force a policy prohibiting law enforcement gangs as required by Section 13670.(11) Adopt and maintain in continuous force an ordinance or other enforceable policy that complies with the requirements of Section 13650.(e) A qualified entity enrolled in this pilot program may establish a domestic violence death review team as described in, and subject to the applicable provisions of, Sections 11163.3 to 11163.5, inclusive.(f) When a peace officer authorized under this program issues a citation for a violation of state law, the citation shall require the person cited to appear in the superior court of the county in which the offense was committed, and shall be submitted to the district attorney of that county.(g) Any criminal charge resulting from a custodial arrest made by, or citation issued by, a peace officer designated pursuant to this program, while exercising the authority granted by Section 830.83, shall be within the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of California.(h) Any official action taken by a peace officer designated pursuant to this program, while exercising the authority granted by Section 830.83, including, without limitation, any detention, arrest, use of force, citation, release, search, or application for, or service of, any warrant, shall be taken in accordance with all laws applicable to a California peace officer employed by a local law enforcement agency.(i) The sovereign immunity of the state shall not extend to any act or omission arising out of the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot program, including, without limitation, any act or omission by a tribal law enforcement officer exercising, or purporting to exercise, any authority as a California peace officer. It is the intent of the Legislature that such tribal law enforcement officers be similarly situated to California peace officers employed by local law enforcement agencies.(j) The peace officer authority granted to any person pursuant to this program shall be automatically revoked on July 1, 2029.(k) (1) The Attorney General, in coordination with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, shall provide ongoing monitoring, evaluation, and support for the pilot program. This subdivision does not require the Attorney General or the commission to provide legal representation, advice, or counsel to any program participant.(2) A qualified entity may terminate their participation in the pilot program at will, however, the requirements of paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (d) shall remain in effect.(3) The Department of Justice, in coordination with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, may suspend or terminate a qualified entity’s participation in the program for gross misconduct or for willful or persistent failure to comply with the requirements of this article.(4) (A) (i) By no later than July 1, 2028, the department shall prepare and submit an interim report to the Legislature, the Assembly Select Committee on Native American Affairs, and the Assembly and Senate Public Safety Committees.(ii) By no later than January 1, 2030, the department shall prepare and submit a final report to the Legislature, the Assembly Select Committee on Native American Affairs, and the Assembly and Senate Public Safety Committees.(B) The reports required by this section shall include, without limitation, the impacts of the pilot program on case clearance rates, including, without limitation, homicide and missing persons cases, the impact of the pilot program on crime rates on Indian lands and surrounding communities, the impact of the pilot program on recruitment and retention of tribal police, a discussion of feasibility and implementation difficulties, and recommendations to the Legislature.(C) The reports required by this paragraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(l) The Tribal Police Pilot Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All moneys in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used to assist Tribal Police Pilot Program participants with fiscal needs associated with the development of information technology, such as the establishment of databases and recordkeeping, necessary for the purposes of complying with any state-mandated reporting required of California law enforcement agencies and employers of peace officers.(m) This section shall be construed to empower Indian tribes and tribal law enforcement officers to exercise powers conferred by the laws of the State of California in a manner consistent with those laws. Such powers are in addition to a tribe’s inherent powers of self-government. This section shall not be construed to infringe upon the sovereignty of any Indian tribe nor their inherent authority to self-govern, including the authority to enact laws that govern their lands.(n) Participating tribes may enter into an agreement to share liability and collaborate on Missing and Murdered Indigenous Persons cases.(o) As used in this section, the following terms are defined as follows:(1) “Department” means the Department of Justice or any subdivision thereof to whom the Attorney General has delegated responsibility for the provisions of this section.(2) “Indian country” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1151 of Title 18 of the United States Code.(3) “Qualified entity” means any of the three federally recognized tribes to be selected by the department, provided that those tribes elect to participate. In selecting the tribes, the department shall consider selecting tribes of different sizes from different parts of the state, as well as a tribe’s access to public safety resources.(4) “Qualified member” means a chief of police who is appointed by, or a person who is regularly employed as a law enforcement, police, or public safety officer or investigator by, a qualified entity, and who meets all of the requirements and qualifications in subdivision (c), and who has been designated by the qualified entity to be a peace officer pursuant to this program.11073.5. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.11073.6. This article shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of this article.SEC. 22. Section 209 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:209. (a) (1) The judge of the juvenile court of a county, or, if there is more than one judge, any of the judges of the juvenile court shall, at least annually, inspect any jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility situated in this state that, in the preceding calendar year, was used for confinement, for more than 24 hours, of any juvenile.(2) The judge shall promptly notify the operator of the jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility of any observed noncompliance with minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections under Sections 210, 875, 885, and subdivision (e) of Section 207.1. Based on the facility’s subsequent compliance with the provisions of subdivisions (d) and (e), the judge shall thereafter make a finding whether the facility is a suitable place for the confinement of juveniles and shall note the finding in the minutes of the court.(3) (A) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall conduct conduct, at a minimum, a biennial inspection of each jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility situated in this state that, during the preceding calendar year, was used for confinement, for more than 24 hours, of any juvenile. The board shall promptly notify the operator of any jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility of any noncompliance found, upon inspection, with any of the minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections under Section 210, 210.2, 875, 885, or subdivision (e) of Section 207.1.(B) Any duly authorized officer, employee, or agent of the board may, upon presentation of proper identification, enter and inspect any area of any juvenile local detention facility, without notice, to conduct an inspection required or authorized by this paragraph.(4) If either a judge of the juvenile court or the board, after inspection of a jail, juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, lockup, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility finds that it is not being operated and maintained as a suitable place for the confinement of juveniles, the juvenile court or the board shall give notice of its finding to all persons having authority to confine juveniles pursuant to this chapter and, commencing 60 days thereafter, the facility shall not be used for confinement of juveniles until the time the judge or board, as the case may be, finds, after reinspection of the facility, that the conditions that rendered the facility unsuitable have been remedied, and the facility is a suitable place for confinement of juveniles.(5) The custodian of each jail, juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, lockup, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility shall make any reports as may be requested by the board or the juvenile court to effectuate the purposes of this section.(b) (1) The Board of State and Community Corrections may inspect any law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults and that it has reason to believe may not be in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 207.1 or with the certification requirements or standards adopted under Section 210.2. A judge of the juvenile court shall conduct an annual inspection, either in person or through a delegated member of the appropriate county or regional juvenile justice commission, of any law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults that, in the preceding year, was used for the secure detention of any juvenile. If the law enforcement facility is observed, upon inspection, to be out of compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 207.1, or with any standard adopted under Section 210.2, the board or the judge shall promptly notify the operator of the law enforcement facility of the specific points of noncompliance.(2) If either the judge or the board finds after inspection that the facility is not being operated and maintained in conformity with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 207.1 or with the certification requirements or standards adopted under Section 210.2, the juvenile court or the board shall give notice of its finding to all persons having authority to securely detain juveniles in the facility, and, commencing 60 days thereafter, the facility shall not be used for the secure detention of a juvenile until the time the judge or the board, as the case may be, finds, after reinspection, that the conditions that rendered the facility unsuitable have been remedied, and the facility is a suitable place for the confinement of juveniles in conformity with all requirements of law.(3) The custodian of each law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults shall make any report as may be requested by the board or by the juvenile court to effectuate the purposes of this subdivision.(c) The board shall collect biennial data on the number, place, and duration of confinements of juveniles in jails and lockups, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 207.1, and shall publish biennially this information in the form as it deems appropriate for the purpose of providing public information on continuing compliance with the requirements of Section 207.1.(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail shall be unsuitable for the confinement of juveniles if it is not in compliance with one or more of the minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections under Section 210, 210.2, 875, 885, or subdivision (e) of Section 207.1, and if, within 60 days of having received notice of noncompliance from the board or the judge of the juvenile court, the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail has failed to file an approved corrective action plan with the Board of State and Community Corrections to correct the condition or conditions of noncompliance of which it has been notified. The(2) (A) A corrective action plan shall outline how the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail plans to correct the issue of noncompliance and give a reasonable timeframe, not to exceed 90 days, for resolution, that the board shall either approve or deny. In(B) Subject to revocation, the board may delegate the authority to approve or disapprove a corrective action plan to the board’s executive director or a deputy director. A delegee shall approve or disapprove the corrective action plan in accordance with criteria and considerations for approval or disapproval, which the board shall develop. The approval or disapproval of a corrective action plan by a delegee shall be effective as of the date the determination is made by the delegee. If that determination is made more than 15 days prior to the board’s next regularly scheduled meeting, the board shall either ratify or overrule the delegee’s approval or disapproval of the corrective action plan at its next regularly scheduled meeting. If that determination is made 15 days or fewer prior to the board’s next regularly scheduled meeting, the board shall either ratify or overrule the delegee’s approval or disapproval of the corrective action plan at the first regularly scheduled meeting occurring after the next regularly scheduled meeting. The board’s ratification or overruling of the corrective action plan shall not alter the effective date of the delegee’s initial determination to approve or disapprove the corrective action plan or extend any time period for compliance.(3) In the event the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail fails to meet its commitment to resolve noncompliance issues outlined in its corrective action plan, the board shall make a determination of suitability at its next scheduled meeting.(e) If a juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility is not in compliance with one or more of the minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections under Section 210, 875, 885, or subdivision (e) of Section 207.1, and where the noncompliance arises from sustained occupancy levels that are above the population capacity permitted by applicable minimum standards, the juvenile hall shall be unsuitable for the confinement of juveniles if the board or the judge of the juvenile court determines that conditions in the facility pose a serious risk to the health, safety, or welfare of juveniles confined in the facility. In making its determination of suitability, the board or the judge of the juvenile court shall consider, in addition to the noncompliance with minimum standards, the totality of conditions in the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility, including the extent and duration of overpopulation as well as staffing, program, physical plant, and medical and mental health care conditions in the facility. The Board of State and Community Corrections may develop guidelines and procedures for its determination of suitability in accordance with this subdivision and to assist counties in bringing their juvenile halls, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility into full compliance with applicable minimum standards. This subdivision shall not be interpreted to exempt a juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility from having to correct, in accordance with subdivision (d), any minimum standard violations that are not directly related to overpopulation of the facility.(f) All reports and notices of findings prepared by the Board of State and Community Corrections pursuant to this section shall be posted on the Board of State and Community Corrections’ internet website in a manner in which they are accessible to the public.(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Juvenile” means a person who meets any of the following criteria:(A) A person under 18 years of age.(B) A person under the maximum age of juvenile court jurisdiction who is not currently an incarcerated adult as defined in paragraph (2) of this subdivision.(C) A person whose case originated in the juvenile court and is subject to Section 208.5.(2) “Incarcerated adult” means a person who is 18 years of age or older, not subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, and has been arrested and is in custody for, or awaiting trial on, a criminal charge, or has been convicted of a criminal offense, and is not a juvenile defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of this subdivision.(3) “Subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court” means a person alleged or found to be subject to Section 601, 602, 607, or 875.(h) This section does not require the judge of the juvenile court or the board to make determinations of suitability for local correctional facilities based on standards adopted pursuant to Section 6030 of the Penal Code.(i) (1) The board may bring a civil action to enforce compliance with minimum standards for juvenile facilities or closure, as described in this section, in the superior court in the county in which a facility is located if the facility has received notice pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).(2) This subdivision does not preclude the Attorney General from conducting an independent investigation or bringing a civil action of its own to address violations of any applicable law.(3) The board may seek any appropriate relief available under existing law, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief, orders compelling compliance, sanctions, and equitable relief it deems necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of juveniles in custody within the applicable county. The board may also seek attorney’s fees to the extent authorized by existing law.(4) The board’s authority to bring a civil action pursuant to this section is in addition to any other enforcement authority and remedies available under existing law.(5) The board’s authority to bring a civil action does not limit the ability of the affected county to seek any temporary or permanent relief from the obligations or consequences imposed by this section, to the extent that relief is available under existing law.SEC. 23. Section 4361 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4361. (a) As used in this section, “department” means the State Department of State Hospitals.(b) The purpose of this chapter is to, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, promote the diversion of individuals with serious mental disorders as prescribed in Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, and to assist counties in providing diversion for individuals with serious mental illnesses who have been found incompetent to stand trial for a felony charge. In implementing this chapter, the department shall consider local discretion and flexibility in diversion activities that meet the community’s needs and provide for the safe and effective treatment of individuals with serious mental disorders across a continuum of care.(c) (1) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the department may solicit proposals from, and may contract with, a county to help fund the development or expansion of pretrial diversion described in Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, for the population described in subdivision (b) and that meets all of the following criteria:(A) Participants are individuals diagnosed with a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, including, but not limited to, bipolar disorder, schizophrenia, and schizoaffective disorder, but excluding a primary diagnosis of antisocial personality disorder, borderline personality disorder, and pedophilia, and who are presenting non-substance-induced psychotic symptoms, who have been found incompetent to stand trial pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code.(B) There is a significant relationship between the individual’s serious mental disorder and the charged offense, or between the individual’s conditions of homelessness and the charged offense.(C) The individual does not pose an unreasonable risk of danger to public safety, as defined in Section 1170.18 of the Penal Code, if treated in the community.(2) A county submitting a proposal for funding under this chapter shall designate a lead entity to apply for the funds. This lead entity shall show in its proposal that it has support from other county entities or other relevant entities, including courts, that are necessary to provide successful diversion of individuals under the contract.(d) When evaluating proposals from the county, the department, in consultation with the Council on Criminal Justice and Behavioral Health within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, department shall prioritize proposals that demonstrate all of the following:(1) Provision of clinically appropriate or evidence-based mental health treatment and wraparound services across a continuum of care, as appropriate, to meet the individual needs of the diversion participant. For purposes of this section, “wraparound services” means services provided in addition to the mental health treatment necessary to meet the individual’s needs for successfully managing the individual’s mental health symptoms and to successfully live in the community. Wraparound services provided by the diversion program shall include appropriate housing, intensive case management, and substance use disorder treatment, and may include, without limitation, forensic assertive community treatment teams, crisis residential services, criminal justice coordination, peer support, and vocational support.(2) Collaboration between community stakeholders and other partner government agencies in the diversion of individuals with serious mental disorders.(3) Connection of individuals to services in the community after they have completed diversion as provided in this chapter.(e) The department may also provide funding in the contract with the county, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the cost of providing postbooking assessment of defendants who are likely to be found incompetent to stand trial on felony charges to determine whether the defendant would benefit from diversion as included in the contract.(f) The department may also provide funding in the contract with the county, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the cost of in-jail treatment prior to the placement in the community for up to an average of 15 days for defendants who have been approved by the court for diversion as included in the contract.(g) A county contracted pursuant to this chapter shall report data and outcomes to the department, within 30 days after the end of each month, regarding those individuals targeted by the contract and in the program. This subdivision does not preclude the department from specifying reporting formats or from modifying, reducing, or adding data elements or outcome measures from a contracting county, as needed to provide for reporting of effective data and outcome measures. Notwithstanding any other law, but only to the extent not prohibited by federal law, the county shall provide specific patient information to the department for reporting purposes. The patient information is confidential and is not open to public inspection. A contracting county shall, at a minimum, report all of the following:(1) The number of individuals that the court ordered to postbooking diversion and the length of time for which the defendant has been ordered to diversion.(2) The number of individuals participating in diversion.(3) The name, social security number, criminal identification and information (CII) number, date of birth, and demographics of each individual participating in the program. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(4) The length of time in diversion for each participating individual. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(5) The types of services and supports provided to each individual participating in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(6) The number of days each individual was in jail prior to placement in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(7) The number of days that each individual spent in each level of care facility. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(8) The diagnoses of each individual participating in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(9) The nature and felony or misdemeanor classification of the charges for each individual participating in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(10) The number of individuals who completed diversion.(11) The name, social security number, CII number, and birth date of each individual who did not complete diversion and the reasons for not completing. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.(h) Contracts awarded pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and are not subject to approval by the Department of General Services.(i) The funds shall not be used to supplant existing services or services reimbursable from an available source but rather to expand upon them or support new services for which existing reimbursement may be limited.(j) (1) Beginning July 1, 2021, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the department may amend contracts with a county to fund the expansion of an existing department-funded pretrial diversion as described in Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, for the population described in subdivision (b) and that meets both of the following criteria:(A) All participants identified for potential diversion are found incompetent to stand trial on a felony charge.(B) Participants diverted through a program expansion suffer from a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, excluding antisocial personality disorder, borderline personality disorder, and pedophilia.(2) Counties expanding their programs under this section will not be required to meet any additional match funding requirements.(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the state hospitals and the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other similar instruction, as necessary.(l) The department shall have access to the arrest records and state summary of criminal history of defendants who are participating or have participated in the diversion program. The information may be used solely for the purpose of looking at the recidivism rate for those patients.(m) If the defendant is committed directly to a county program in lieu of commitment to the department, counties shall provide the minute order from the court documenting the incompetent to stand trial finding on a felony charge and the original alienist evaluation associated with that finding.(n) For department-funded diversion programs funded through appropriations made by the Budget Act of 2018 or new county programs funded through the Budget Act of 2021, participants in those county programs may include individuals diagnosed with schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder, or bipolar disorder, who are likely to be found incompetent to stand trial for felony charges, pursuant to Section 1368 of the Penal Code, or who have been found incompetent to stand trial pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, until new funds are dispersed to the county. Counties shall continue to comply with all terms of the contract signed with the department, including matching fund and data reporting requirements.SEC. 24. The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated for the 2025–26 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Department of Justice, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, for purposes of administering the Tribal Police Pilot Program pursuant to Article 2.45 (commencing with Section 11073) of Chapter 1 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.SEC. 25. This act is a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, has been identified as related to the budget in the Budget Bill, and shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.